Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.145

State agencies' duty to control spread of noxious weeds—Replacement of noxious weeds with native forage plants that are beneficial to pollinators.

(1) All state agencies shall control noxious weeds on lands they own, lease, or otherwise control through integrated pest management practices. Agencies shall develop plans in cooperation with county noxious weed control boards to control noxious weeds in accordance with standards in this chapter. Agencies shall appoint a liaison whose duties include serving as a common point of contact for all weed boards and developing and implementing noxious weed control plans.

(2) All state agencies' lands must comply with this chapter, regardless of noxious weed control efforts on adjacent lands.

(3) While conducting planned projects to ensure compliance with this chapter, all agencies must give preference, when deemed appropriate by the acting agency for the project and targeted resource management goals, to replacing noxious weeds with native forage plants that are pollen-rich or nectar-rich and beneficial for all pollinators, including honey bees.

[ 2021 c 217 s 9; 2019 c 353 s 4; 2016 c 44 s 2; 1997 c 353 s 18; 1995 c 374 s 75.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 353: See note following RCW 43.23.300.

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 69, 70, and 72-79: See note following RCW 16.24.130.